test/src/gt-gloss-yamls/NA_VINIT_aagim_gt-glossing.yaml
     1+aagam+NA+Dim+ThmPos+Pej+Loc: ndaagmensmishing
     1+aagam+NA+Dim+ThmPos+Pej+Pl: ndaagmensmishag
     2+aagam+NA+Con+ThmPos+Pej+4: gdaagmenymishan
     2+aagam+NA+Con+ThmPos+Pej+Loc: gdaagmenymishing
     2+aagam+NA+Con+ThmPos+Pej+Pl: gdaagmenymishag
     2+aagam+NA+Dim+ThmPos+Pej+4: gdaagmensmishan
     2+aagam+NA+Dim+ThmPos+Pej+Loc: gdaagmensmishing
     2+aagam+NA+Dim+ThmPos+Pej+Pl: gdaagmensmishag
     3+aagam+NA+Con+ThmPos+Pej+4: daagmenymishan
     3+aagam+NA+Con+ThmPos+Pej+Loc: daagmenymishing
     3+aagam+NA+Dim+ThmPos+Pej+4: daagmensmishan
     3+aagam+NA+Dim+ThmPos+Pej+Loc: daagmensmishing
     X+aagam+NA+Con+ThmPos+Pej+4: daagmenymishan
     X+aagam+NA+Con+ThmPos+Pej+Loc: daagmenymishing
     X+aagam+NA+Con+ThmPos+Pej+Pl: daagmenymishag
     X+aagam+NA+Dim+ThmPos+Pej+4: daagmensmishan
     X+aagam+NA+Dim+ThmPos+Pej+Loc: daagmensmishing
     X+aagam+NA+Dim+ThmPos+Pej+Pl: daagmensmishag
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 2, 3, 5, 6
     1+aagam+NA+Con+ThmPos+1+Pl+Prt: ndaagmenyminaanba
     1+aagam+NA+Con+ThmPos+1+Pl+Voc+Pl: ndaagmenyminaandig
     1+aagam+NA+Dim+ThmPos+1+Pl+Prt: ndaagmensminaanba
     1+aagam+NA+Dim+ThmPos+1+Pl+Voc+Pl: ndaagmensminaandig
     2+aagam+NA+Con+ThmPos+1+Pl+Prt: gdaagmenyminaanba
     2+aagam+NA+Con+ThmPos+1+Pl+Voc+Pl: gdaagmenyminaandig
     2+aagam+NA+Con+ThmPos+2+Pl+Prt: gdaagmenymiwaaba
     2+aagam+NA+Con+ThmPos+2+Pl+Voc+Pl: gdaagmenymiwaadig
     2+aagam+NA+Dim+ThmPos+1+Pl+Prt: gdaagmensminaanba
     2+aagam+NA+Dim+ThmPos+1+Pl+Voc+Pl: gdaagmensminaandig
     2+aagam+NA+Dim+ThmPos+2+Pl+Prt: gdaagmensmiwaaba
     2+aagam+NA+Dim+ThmPos+2+Pl+Voc+Pl: gdaagmensmiwaadig
     3+aagam+NA+Con+ThmPos+3+4+Prt: daagmenyminwiba
     3+aagam+NA+Dim+ThmPos+3+4+Prt: daagmensminwiba
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 2, 3, 5, 7
     1+aagam+NA+Con+ThmPos+1+Pl+4: ndaagmenyminaanin
     1+aagam+NA+Con+ThmPos+1+Pl+Loc: ndaagmenyminaaning
     1+aagam+NA+Con+ThmPos+1+Pl+Pl: ndaagmenyminaanig
     1+aagam+NA+Dim+ThmPos+1+Pl+4: ndaagmensminaanin
     1+aagam+NA+Dim+ThmPos+1+Pl+Loc: ndaagmensminaaning
     1+aagam+NA+Dim+ThmPos+1+Pl+Pl: ndaagmensminaanig
     2+aagam+NA+Con+ThmPos+1+Pl+4: gdaagmenyminaanin
     2+aagam+NA+Con+ThmPos+1+Pl+Loc: gdaagmenyminaaning
     2+aagam+NA+Con+ThmPos+1+Pl+Pl: gdaagmenyminaanig
     2+aagam+NA+Con+ThmPos+2+Pl+4: gdaagmenymiwaan
     2+aagam+NA+Con+ThmPos+2+Pl+Loc: gdaagmenymiwaang
     2+aagam+NA+Con+ThmPos+2+Pl+Pl: gdaagmenymiwaag
     2+aagam+NA+Dim+ThmPos+1+Pl+4: gdaagmensminaanin
     2+aagam+NA+Dim+ThmPos+1+Pl+Loc: gdaagmensminaaning
     2+aagam+NA+Dim+ThmPos+1+Pl+Pl: gdaagmensminaanig
     2+aagam+NA+Dim+ThmPos+2+Pl+4: gdaagmensmiwaan
     2+aagam+NA+Dim+ThmPos+2+Pl+Loc: gdaagmensmiwaang
     2+aagam+NA+Dim+ThmPos+2+Pl+Pl: gdaagmensmiwaag
     3+aagam+NA+Con+ThmPos+2+Pl+4: daagmenymiwaan
     3+aagam+NA+Con+ThmPos+2+Pl+Loc: daagmenymiwaang
     3+aagam+NA+Con+ThmPos+3+4+4: daagmenyminwan
     3+aagam+NA+Con+ThmPos+3+4+Loc: daagmenyminiing
     3+aagam+NA+Dim+ThmPos+2+Pl+4: daagmensmiwaan
     3+aagam+NA+Dim+ThmPos+2+Pl+Loc: daagmensmiwaang
     3+aagam+NA+Dim+ThmPos+3+4+4: daagmensminwan
     3+aagam+NA+Dim+ThmPos+3+4+Loc: daagmensminiing
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 2, 3, 6, 7
     1+aagam+NA+Con+ThmPos+Prt+4: ndaagmenymibniin
     1+aagam+NA+Con+ThmPos+Prt+Loc: ndaagmenymibniing
     1+aagam+NA+Con+ThmPos+Prt+Pl: ndaagmenymibniig
     1+aagam+NA+Dim+ThmPos+Prt+4: ndaagmensmibniin
     1+aagam+NA+Dim+ThmPos+Prt+Loc: ndaagmensmibniing
     1+aagam+NA+Dim+ThmPos+Prt+Pl: ndaagmensmibniig
     2+aagam+NA+Con+ThmPos+Prt+4: gdaagmenymibniin
     2+aagam+NA+Con+ThmPos+Prt+Loc: gdaagmenymibniing
     2+aagam+NA+Con+ThmPos+Prt+Pl: gdaagmenymibniig
     2+aagam+NA+Dim+ThmPos+Prt+4: gdaagmensmibniin
     2+aagam+NA+Dim+ThmPos+Prt+Loc: gdaagmensmibniing
     2+aagam+NA+Dim+ThmPos+Prt+Pl: gdaagmensmibniig
     3+aagam+NA+Con+ThmPos+Prt+4: daagmenymibniin
     3+aagam+NA+Con+ThmPos+Prt+Loc: daagmenymibniing
     3+aagam+NA+Dim+ThmPos+Prt+4: daagmensmibniin
     3+aagam+NA+Dim+ThmPos+Prt+Loc: daagmensmibniing
     X+aagam+NA+Con+ThmPos+Prt+4: daagmenymibniin
     X+aagam+NA+Con+ThmPos+Prt+Loc: daagmenymibniing
     X+aagam+NA+Con+ThmPos+Prt+Pl: daagmenymibniig
     X+aagam+NA+Dim+ThmPos+Prt+4: daagmensmibniin
     X+aagam+NA+Dim+ThmPos+Prt+Loc: daagmensmibniing
     X+aagam+NA+Dim+ThmPos+Prt+Pl: daagmensmibniig
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 2, 4, 5, 6
     1+aagam+NA+Con+Pej+1+Pl+Prt: ndaagmenyshinaanba
     1+aagam+NA+Con+Pej+1+Pl+Voc+Pl: ndaagmenyshinaandig
     1+aagam+NA+Dim+Pej+1+Pl+Prt: ndaagmensshinaanba
     1+aagam+NA+Dim+Pej+1+Pl+Voc+Pl: ndaagmensshinaandig
     2+aagam+NA+Con+Pej+1+Pl+Prt: gdaagmenyshinaanba
     2+aagam+NA+Con+Pej+1+Pl+Voc+Pl: gdaagmenyshinaandig
     2+aagam+NA+Con+Pej+2+Pl+Prt: gdaagmenyshiwaaba
     2+aagam+NA+Con+Pej+2+Pl+Voc+Pl: gdaagmenyshiwaadig
     2+aagam+NA+Dim+Pej+1+Pl+Prt: gdaagmensshinaanba
     2+aagam+NA+Dim+Pej+1+Pl+Voc+Pl: gdaagmensshinaandig
     2+aagam+NA+Dim+Pej+2+Pl+Prt: gdaagmensshiwaaba
     2+aagam+NA+Dim+Pej+2+Pl+Voc+Pl: gdaagmensshiwaadig
     3+aagam+NA+Con+Pej+3+4+Prt: daagmenyshinwiba
     3+aagam+NA+Dim+Pej+3+4+Prt: daagmensshinwiba
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 2, 4, 5, 7
     1+aagam+NA+Con+Pej+1+Pl+4: ndaagmenyshinaanin
     1+aagam+NA+Con+Pej+1+Pl+Loc: ndaagmenyshinaaning
     1+aagam+NA+Con+Pej+1+Pl+Pl: ndaagmenyshinaanig
     1+aagam+NA+Dim+Pej+1+Pl+4: ndaagmensshinaanin
     1+aagam+NA+Dim+Pej+1+Pl+Loc: ndaagmensshinaaning
     1+aagam+NA+Dim+Pej+1+Pl+Pl: ndaagmensshinaanig
     2+aagam+NA+Con+Pej+1+Pl+4: gdaagmenyshinaanin
     2+aagam+NA+Con+Pej+1+Pl+Loc: gdaagmenyshinaaning
     2+aagam+NA+Con+Pej+1+Pl+Pl: gdaagmenyshinaanig
     2+aagam+NA+Con+Pej+2+Pl+4: gdaagmenyshiwaan
     2+aagam+NA+Con+Pej+2+Pl+Loc: gdaagmenyshiwaang
     2+aagam+NA+Con+Pej+2+Pl+Pl: gdaagmenyshiwaag
     2+aagam+NA+Dim+Pej+1+Pl+4: gdaagmensshinaanin
     2+aagam+NA+Dim+Pej+1+Pl+Loc: gdaagmensshinaaning
     2+aagam+NA+Dim+Pej+1+Pl+Pl: gdaagmensshinaanig
     2+aagam+NA+Dim+Pej+2+Pl+4: gdaagmensshiwaan
     2+aagam+NA+Dim+Pej+2+Pl+Loc: gdaagmensshiwaang
     2+aagam+NA+Dim+Pej+2+Pl+Pl: gdaagmensshiwaag
     3+aagam+NA+Con+Pej+2+Pl+4: daagmenyshiwaan
     3+aagam+NA+Con+Pej+2+Pl+Loc: daagmenyshiwaang
     3+aagam+NA+Con+Pej+3+4+4: daagmenyshinwan
     3+aagam+NA+Con+Pej+3+4+Loc: daagmenyshiniing
     3+aagam+NA+Dim+Pej+2+Pl+4: daagmensshiwaan
     3+aagam+NA+Dim+Pej+2+Pl+Loc: daagmensshiwaang
     3+aagam+NA+Dim+Pej+3+4+4: daagmensshinwan
     3+aagam+NA+Dim+Pej+3+4+Loc: daagmensshiniing
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 2, 4, 6, 7
     1+aagam+NA+Con+Pej+Prt+4: ndaagmenyshibniin
     1+aagam+NA+Con+Pej+Prt+Loc: ndaagmenyshibniing
     1+aagam+NA+Con+Pej+Prt+Pl: ndaagmenyshibniig
     1+aagam+NA+Dim+Pej+Prt+4: ndaagmensshibniin
     1+aagam+NA+Dim+Pej+Prt+Loc: ndaagmensshibniing
     1+aagam+NA+Dim+Pej+Prt+Pl: ndaagmensshibniig
     2+aagam+NA+Con+Pej+Prt+4: gdaagmenyshibniin
     2+aagam+NA+Con+Pej+Prt+Loc: gdaagmenyshibniing
     2+aagam+NA+Con+Pej+Prt+Pl: gdaagmenyshibniig
     2+aagam+NA+Dim+Pej+Prt+4: gdaagmensshibniin
     2+aagam+NA+Dim+Pej+Prt+Loc: gdaagmensshibniing
     2+aagam+NA+Dim+Pej+Prt+Pl: gdaagmensshibniig
     3+aagam+NA+Con+Pej+Prt+4: daagmenyshibniin
     3+aagam+NA+Con+Pej+Prt+Loc: daagmenyshibniing
     3+aagam+NA+Dim+Pej+Prt+4: daagmensshibniin
     3+aagam+NA+Dim+Pej+Prt+Loc: daagmensshibniing
     X+aagam+NA+Con+Pej+Prt+4: daagmenyshibniin
     X+aagam+NA+Con+Pej+Prt+Loc: daagmenyshibniing
     X+aagam+NA+Con+Pej+Prt+Pl: daagmenyshibniig
     X+aagam+NA+Dim+Pej+Prt+4: daagmensshibniin
     X+aagam+NA+Dim+Pej+Prt+Loc: daagmensshibniing
     X+aagam+NA+Dim+Pej+Prt+Pl: daagmensshibniig
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 2, 5, 6, 7
     1+aagam+NA+Con+1+Pl+Prt+4: ndaagmenynaanbaniin
     1+aagam+NA+Con+1+Pl+Prt+Loc: ndaagmenynaanbaniing
     1+aagam+NA+Con+1+Pl+Prt+Pl: ndaagmenynaanbaniig
     1+aagam+NA+Dim+1+Pl+Prt+4: ndaagmensnaanbaniin
     1+aagam+NA+Dim+1+Pl+Prt+Loc: ndaagmensnaanbaniing
     1+aagam+NA+Dim+1+Pl+Prt+Pl: ndaagmensnaanbaniig
     2+aagam+NA+Con+1+Pl+Prt+4: gdaagmenynaanbaniin
     2+aagam+NA+Con+1+Pl+Prt+Loc: gdaagmenynaanbaniing
     2+aagam+NA+Con+1+Pl+Prt+Pl: gdaagmenynaanbaniig
     2+aagam+NA+Con+2+Pl+Prt+4: gdaagmenywaabniin
     2+aagam+NA+Con+2+Pl+Prt+Loc: gdaagmenywaabniing
     2+aagam+NA+Con+2+Pl+Prt+Pl: gdaagmenywaabniig
     2+aagam+NA+Dim+1+Pl+Prt+4: gdaagmensnaanbaniin
     2+aagam+NA+Dim+1+Pl+Prt+Loc: gdaagmensnaanbaniing
     2+aagam+NA+Dim+1+Pl+Prt+Pl: gdaagmensnaanbaniig
     2+aagam+NA+Dim+2+Pl+Prt+4: gdaagmenswaabniin
     2+aagam+NA+Dim+2+Pl+Prt+Loc: gdaagmenswaabniing
     2+aagam+NA+Dim+2+Pl+Prt+Pl: gdaagmenswaabniig
     3+aagam+NA+Con+2+Pl+Prt+4: daagmenywaabniin
     3+aagam+NA+Con+2+Pl+Prt+Loc: daagmenywaabniing
     3+aagam+NA+Con+3+4+Prt+4: daagmenyniwbaniin
     3+aagam+NA+Con+3+4+Prt+Loc: daagmenyniwbaniing
     3+aagam+NA+Dim+2+Pl+Prt+4: daagmenswaabniin
     3+aagam+NA+Dim+2+Pl+Prt+Loc: daagmenswaabniing
     3+aagam+NA+Dim+3+4+Prt+4: daagmensniwbaniin
     3+aagam+NA+Dim+3+4+Prt+Loc: daagmensniwbaniing
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 3, 4, 5, 6
     1+aagam+NA+ThmPos+Pej+1+Pl+Prt: ndaagmimshinaanba
     1+aagam+NA+ThmPos+Pej+1+Pl+Voc+Pl: ndaagmimshinaandig
     2+aagam+NA+ThmPos+Pej+1+Pl+Prt: gdaagmimshinaanba
     2+aagam+NA+ThmPos+Pej+1+Pl+Voc+Pl: gdaagmimshinaandig
     2+aagam+NA+ThmPos+Pej+2+Pl+Prt: gdaagmimshiwaaba
     2+aagam+NA+ThmPos+Pej+2+Pl+Voc+Pl: gdaagmimshiwaadig
     3+aagam+NA+ThmPos+Pej+3+4+Prt: daagmimshinwiba
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 3, 4, 5, 7
     1+aagam+NA+ThmPos+Pej+1+Pl+4: ndaagmimshinaanin
     1+aagam+NA+ThmPos+Pej+1+Pl+Loc: ndaagmimshinaaning
     1+aagam+NA+ThmPos+Pej+1+Pl+Pl: ndaagmimshinaanig
     2+aagam+NA+ThmPos+Pej+1+Pl+4: gdaagmimshinaanin
     2+aagam+NA+ThmPos+Pej+1+Pl+Loc: gdaagmimshinaaning
     2+aagam+NA+ThmPos+Pej+1+Pl+Pl: gdaagmimshinaanig
     2+aagam+NA+ThmPos+Pej+2+Pl+4: gdaagmimshiwaan
     2+aagam+NA+ThmPos+Pej+2+Pl+Loc: gdaagmimshiwaang
     2+aagam+NA+ThmPos+Pej+2+Pl+Pl: gdaagmimshiwaag
     3+aagam+NA+ThmPos+Pej+2+Pl+4: daagmimshiwaan
     3+aagam+NA+ThmPos+Pej+2+Pl+Loc: daagmimshiwaang
     3+aagam+NA+ThmPos+Pej+3+4+4: daagmimshinwan
     3+aagam+NA+ThmPos+Pej+3+4+Loc: daagmimshiniing
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 3, 4, 6, 7
     1+aagam+NA+ThmPos+Pej+Prt+4: ndaagmimshibniin
     1+aagam+NA+ThmPos+Pej+Prt+Loc: ndaagmimshibniing
     1+aagam+NA+ThmPos+Pej+Prt+Pl: ndaagmimshibniig
     2+aagam+NA+ThmPos+Pej+Prt+4: gdaagmimshibniin
     2+aagam+NA+ThmPos+Pej+Prt+Loc: gdaagmimshibniing
     2+aagam+NA+ThmPos+Pej+Prt+Pl: gdaagmimshibniig
     3+aagam+NA+ThmPos+Pej+Prt+4: daagmimshibniin
     3+aagam+NA+ThmPos+Pej+Prt+Loc: daagmimshibniing
     X+aagam+NA+ThmPos+Pej+Prt+4: daagmimshibniin
     X+aagam+NA+ThmPos+Pej+Prt+Loc: daagmimshibniing
     X+aagam+NA+ThmPos+Pej+Prt+Pl: daagmimshibniig
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 3, 5, 6, 7
     1+aagam+NA+ThmPos+1+Pl+Prt+4: ndaagmimnaanbaniin
     1+aagam+NA+ThmPos+1+Pl+Prt+Loc: ndaagmimnaanbaniing
     1+aagam+NA+ThmPos+1+Pl+Prt+Pl: ndaagmimnaanbaniig
     2+aagam+NA+ThmPos+1+Pl+Prt+4: gdaagmimnaanbaniin
     2+aagam+NA+ThmPos+1+Pl+Prt+Loc: gdaagmimnaanbaniing
     2+aagam+NA+ThmPos+1+Pl+Prt+Pl: gdaagmimnaanbaniig
     2+aagam+NA+ThmPos+2+Pl+Prt+4: gdaagmimwaabniin
     2+aagam+NA+ThmPos+2+Pl+Prt+Loc: gdaagmimwaabniing
     2+aagam+NA+ThmPos+2+Pl+Prt+Pl: gdaagmimwaabniig
     3+aagam+NA+ThmPos+2+Pl+Prt+4: daagmimwaabniin
     3+aagam+NA+ThmPos+2+Pl+Prt+Loc: daagmimwaabniing
     3+aagam+NA+ThmPos+3+4+Prt+4: daagmimniwbaniin
     3+aagam+NA+ThmPos+3+4+Prt+Loc: daagmimniwbaniing
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 4, 5, 6, 7
     1+aagam+NA+Pej+1+Pl+Prt+4: ndaagmishnaanbaniin
     1+aagam+NA+Pej+1+Pl+Prt+Loc: ndaagmishnaanbaniing
     1+aagam+NA+Pej+1+Pl+Prt+Pl: ndaagmishnaanbaniig
     2+aagam+NA+Pej+1+Pl+Prt+4: gdaagmishnaanbaniin
